Maryland, session 2026, HB0628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0628*

HOUSE BILL 628
Article – Human Services
SUBTITLE 5C. UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME FOR TRANSITION–AGE YOUTH FOSTER
CARE TRANSITION GRANT PROGRAM.
5–5C–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE, THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME FOR
TRANSITION–AGE YOUTH FOSTER CARE TRANSITION GRANT PROGRAM.
(C) “UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME” MEANS UNCONDITIONAL CASH PAYMENTS
OF EQUAL AMOUNTS DISTRIBUTED MONTHLY TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS.
5–5C–02.
(A) THERE IS A UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME FOR TRANSITION–AGE YOUTH
FOSTER CARE TRANSITION GRANT PROGRAM WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FOR THE ECONOMIC
SECURITY OF INDIVIDUALS AGING OUT OF THE OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT
PROGRAM.
5–5C–03.
(A) AN BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2028, AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE
ELIGIBLE FOR A UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME FOSTER CARE TRANSITION GRANT OF
$1,000 PER MONTH FOR A PERIOD OF 3 YEARS 1 YEAR IF:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL RESIDED IN AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT ON
THE INDIVIDUAL’S 18TH BIRTHDAY, REGARDLESS OF THE AGE AT WHICH THE
INDIVIDUAL ENTERED OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT; AND
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL’S 18TH BIRTHDAY IS ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1,
2026.
(B) PAYMENTS GRANTS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED INCOME OR RESOURCES FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING
ELIGIBILITY TO RECEIVE BENEFITS OR THE AMOUNTS OF BENEFITS RECEIVED FOR
THE FOLLOWING, AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW:

HOUSE BILL 628 3
(1) THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(2) THE MARYLAND EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT; OR
(3) STATE AND FEDERAL FINANCIAL AID AND COLLEGE SUPPORT
PROGRAMS.
5–5C–04.
ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027 2028, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT
CONTAINS DESCRIPTIVE INFORMATION AND OUTCOME MEASURES OF PROGRAM
RECIPIENTS DURING THE PREVIOUS YEAR, INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM:
(1) THE STARTING INCOME OF EACH RECIPIENT, EXCLUSIVE OF
UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME PAYMENTS A FOSTER CARE TRANSITION GRANT;
(2) GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION ABOUT EACH RECIPIENT, INCLUDING
COUNTY, CITY, AND ZIP CODE OF RESIDENCE;
(3) THE EMPLOYMENT STATUS OF EACH RECIPIENT BEFORE
RECEIVING UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME PAYMENTS A FOSTER CARE TRANSITION
GRANT; AND
(4) THE HOUSING STATUS OF EACH RECIPIENT BEFORE RECEIVING
UNIVERSAL BASIC INCOME PAYMENTS A FOSTER CARE TRANSITION GRANT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of September
30, 2031, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.